Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-179.02
Certified transportation permit, defined.

Certified transportation permit means a document generated by the Nebraska Brand Committee from information provided electronically by a qualified dairy when moving calves under thirty days of age out of the inspection area for beef production purposes. Such information shall include the name and physical address of the owner, the number of head being transported, a physical description of the calves including the date of birth, the color and sex, any identifiers such as metal tags or dangle tags, and any brands and their location, and the actual or intended date of transport.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 5.